North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 6. Disability Income Plan of North Carolina.
§ 135-106.
Long-term disability benefits.

Upon the application of a beneficiary or participant or of his legal representative or any person deemed by the Board of Trustees to represent the participant or beneficiary, any beneficiary or participant who has had five or more years of membership
service may receive long-term disability benefits from the Plan upon approval by the Board of Trustees, commencing on the first day succeeding the conclusion of the short-term disability period provided for in

G.S. 135-105

, provided the beneficiary or participant makes application for such benefit within 180 days after the short-term disability period ceases, after salary continuation payments cease, or after monthly payments for
Workers’ Compensation cease, whichever is later; Provided, that the beneficiary or participant withdraws from active service by terminating employment as a teacher or State employee; Provided, that the Medical Board shall certify
that such beneficiary or participant is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that such incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment and has been continuous thereafter, and that such
incapacity is likely to be permanent; Provided further that the Medical Board shall not certify any beneficiary or participant as disabled who is in receipt of any payments on account of the same incapacity which existed when the
beneficiary first established membership in the Retirement System. The Board of Trustees may extend this 180-day filing requirement upon receipt of clear and convincing evidence that application was delayed through no fault of
the disabled beneficiary or participant and was delayed due to the employers’ miscalculation of the end of the 180-day filing period. However, in no instance shall the filing period be extended beyond an additional 180 days.The
Board of Trustees may require each beneficiary who becomes eligible to receive a long-term disability benefit to have an annual medical review or examination for the first five years and thereafter once every three years after
the commencement of benefits under this section. However, the Board of Trustees may require more frequent examinations and upon the advice of the Medical Board shall determine which cases require such examination. Should any beneficiary
refuse to submit to any examination required by this subsection or by the Medical Board, his long-term disability benefit shall be suspended until he submits to an examination, and should his refusal last for one year, his benefit
may be terminated by the Board of Trustees. If the Medical Board finds that a beneficiary is no longer mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, the Medical Board shall so certify this finding to
the Board of Trustees, and the Board of Trustees may terminate the beneficiary’s long-term disability benefits effective on the last day of the month in which the Medical Board certifies that the beneficiary is no longer disabled.As
to the requirement of five years of membership service, any participant or beneficiary who does not have five years of membership service within the 96 calendar months prior to conclusion of the short-term disability period or
cessation of salary continuation payments, whichever is later, shall not be eligible for long-term disability benefits.Notwithstanding the requirement that the incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment, any participant
who becomes disabled while on an employer approved leave of absence and who is eligible for and in receipt of temporary total benefits under The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, Article 1 of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes,
will be eligible for all benefits provided under this Article.

After the commencement of benefits under this section, the benefits payable under the terms of this section during the first 36 months of the long-term disability period shall be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of 1/12th of the annual base rate of compensation
last payable to the participant or beneficiary prior to the beginning of the short-term disability period as may be adjusted for percentage increases as provided under

G.S. 135-108

, plus sixty-five percent (65%) of 1/12th of the annual longevity payment to which the participant or beneficiary would be eligible, to a maximum of three thousand nine hundred dollars ($3,900) per month reduced
by any primary Social Security disability benefits to which the beneficiary may be entitled, effective as of the first of the month following the month of initial entitlement, and by monthly payments for Workers’ Compensation to
which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled. When primary Social Security disability benefits are increased by cost-of-living adjustments, the increased reduction shall be applied in the first month following the month
in which the member becomes entitled to the increased Social Security benefit. The monthly benefit shall be further reduced by the amount of any monthly payments from the federal Department of Veterans Affairs, any other federal
agency or any payments made under the provisions of

G.S. 127A-108

, to which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled on account of the same disability. Provided, in any event, the benefit payable shall be no less than ten dollars ($10.00) a month. However, a disabled participant
may elect to receive any salary continuation as provided in

G.S. 135-104

in lieu of long-term disability benefits; provided such election shall not extend the first 36 consecutive calendar months of the long-term disability period. An election to receive any salary continuation for any
part of any given day shall be in lieu of any long-term benefit payable for that day, provided further, any lump-sum payout for vacation leave shall be treated as if the beneficiary or participant had exhausted the leave and shall
be in lieu of any long-term benefit otherwise payable. Provided that, in any event, a beneficiary’s benefit shall be reduced during the first 36 months of the long-term disability period by an amount, as determined by the Board
of Trustees, equal to a primary Social Security retirement benefit to which the beneficiary might be entitled, effective as of the first of the month following the month of initial entitlement.After 36 months of long-term disability,
no further benefits are payable under the terms of this section unless the member has been approved and is in receipt of primary Social Security disability benefits. In that case the benefits payable shall be equal to sixty-five
percent (65%) of 1/12th of the annual base rate of compensation last payable to the participant or beneficiary prior to the beginning of the short-term disability period as may be adjusted for percentage increases as provided under

G.S. 135-108

, plus sixty-five percent (65%) of 1/12th of the annual longevity payment to which the participant or beneficiary would be eligible, to a maximum of three thousand nine hundred dollars ($3,900) per month reduced
by the primary Social Security disability benefits to which the beneficiary may be entitled, effective as of the first of the month following the month of initial entitlement, and by monthly payments for Workers’ Compensation to
which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled. When primary Social Security disability benefits are increased by cost-of-living adjustments, the increased reduction shall be applied in the first month following the month
in which the member becomes entitled to the increased Social Security benefit. The monthly benefit shall be further reduced by the amount of any monthly payments from the federal Department of Veterans Affairs, for payments from
any other federal agency, or for any payments made under the provisions of

G.S. 127A-108

, to which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled on account of the same disability. Provided, in any event, the benefit payable shall be no less than ten dollars ($10.00) a month.Notwithstanding the foregoing,
the long-term disability benefit is payable so long as the beneficiary is disabled and is in receipt of a primary Social Security disability benefit until the earliest date at which the beneficiary is eligible for an unreduced
service retirement allowance from the Retirement System, at which time the beneficiary would receive a retirement allowance calculated on the basis of the beneficiary’s average final compensation at the time of disability as adjusted
to reflect compensation increases subsequent to the time of disability and the creditable service accumulated by the beneficiary, including creditable service while in receipt of benefits under the Plan. In the event the beneficiary
has not been approved and is not in receipt of a primary Social Security disability benefit, the long-term disability benefit shall cease after the first 36 months of the long-term disability period. When such a long-term disability
recipient begins receiving this unreduced service retirement allowance from the System, that recipient shall not be subject to the six-month waiting period set forth in

G.S. 135-1(20)

. However, a beneficiary shall be entitled to a restoration of the long-term disability benefit in the event the Social Security Administration grants a retroactive approval for primary Social Security disability
benefits with a benefit effective date within the first 36 months of the long-term disability period. In such event, the long-term disability benefit shall be restored retroactively to the date of cessation.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a beneficiary in receipt of long-term disability benefits who has earnings during the long-term disability period shall have his long-term disability benefit reduced when the sum of the net long-term disability benefit and
the earnings equals one hundred percent (100%) of monthly compensation adjusted as provided under

G.S. 135-108

. The net long-term benefit shall mean the long-term benefit amount payable as calculated under (b) above, after the reduction for Social Security benefits and Workers’ Compensation benefits to which the beneficiary
might be entitled, and after the reduction for any monthly payments from the federal Department of Veterans Affairs, for payments from any other federal agency, or for any payments made under the provisions of

G.S. 127A-108

, to which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled on account of the same disability. The net long-term disability benefit shall be reduced dollar-for-dollar for the amount of earnings in excess of the one
hundred percent (100%) monthly limit. Any beneficiary exceeding the earnings limitations shall notify the Plan by the fifth of the month succeeding the month in which the earnings were received of the amount of earnings in excess
of the limitations herein provided. Failure to report excess earnings may result in a suspension or termination of benefits as determined by the Board of Trustees.

(c1) During the long-term disability period, a beneficiary may return to service for trial rehabilitation for periods of not greater than 36 months of continuous service. Such return will not cause the beneficiary to become a participant and will not
require a new waiting period or short-term disability period to commence regardless of whether the beneficiary is unable to continue in service due to the same incapacity or a different incapacity.A beneficiary who, during
a period of trial rehabilitation, is unable to continue in service may be entitled to a restoration of the long-term disability benefit provided that the Medical Board certifies that the beneficiary is disabled in accordance
with the laws in effect at the time of the Board’s original approval for long-term disability benefits, either due to the same or a different incapacity, notwithstanding the requirement the incapacity has been continuous. In
the event that the Medical Board determines that the long-term disability benefit should be restored, the restored benefit should be calculated in accordance with G.S. 135-106(b); should include any post-disability benefit
adjustments as provided by

G.S. 135-108

; and shall continue as long as the beneficiary remains disabled until the beneficiary has received a total of 36 long-term disability payments. Continuation of long-term disability benefit payments beyond 36
total payments shall be dependent upon approval for primary Social Security disability benefits as required by G.S. 135-106(b).A beneficiary who returns to service for a period of trial rehabilitation and who has continued
in service for greater than 36 continuous months shall again become a participant, and any subsequent incapacity shall be treated as a new incapacity causing a new waiting period to begin. Such a beneficiary may be entitled
to additional long-term disability benefits on account of the new incapacity provided the beneficiary meets all other requirements notwithstanding the requirement of five years of membership service within the 96 calendar months
prior to becoming disabled or the cessation of continuous salary continuation payments.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a participant or beneficiary who has applied for and been approved by the Medical Board for long-term disability benefits may make an irrevocable election, within 90 days from the date of notification of such approval, and
prior to receipt of any long-term disability benefit payments, to forfeit all pending and accrued rights to the long-term disability benefit including any ancillary benefits and retire on an early service retirement allowance,
effective with the first day of the month following the end of the short-term period, or receive a return of accumulated contributions from the Retirement System.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 1989, c. 717, s. 11; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1032, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 779, s. 4; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(u); 2003-284, s. 30.20(l); 2004-78, ss. 3, 4; 2005-91,
s. 6.1; 2005-276, s. 29.30B(a), (b); 2006-74, ss. 3, 4(a), (b); 2007-325, s. 2; 2010-72, s. 7; 2011-294, s. 6; 2012-178, s. 5; 2013-288, s. 7; 2013-405, s. 2; 2014-88, s. 3(i); 2015-67, s. 2.

§ 135-107.
Optional Retirement Program.

Any participant of the Optional Retirement Program who becomes a beneficiary under the Plan shall be eligible to receive long-term disability benefits so long as the beneficiary is disabled and is in receipt of a primary Social Security disability benefit
until the time the beneficiary would first qualify for an unreduced service retirement benefit had the beneficiary elected to be a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, and shall receive no service accruals
as otherwise provided members of the Retirement System under the provisions of G.S. 135-4(y). In the event a beneficiary who was a participant in the Optional Retirement Program has not been approved and is not in receipt of a
primary Social Security disability benefit, the long-term disability benefit shall cease after the first 36 months of the long-term disability period. However, a beneficiary shall be entitled to a restoration of the long-term disability
benefit in the event the Social Security Administration grants a retroactive approval for primary Social Security disability benefits with a benefit effective date within the first 36 months of the long-term disability period.
In such event, the long-term disability benefit shall be restored retroactively to the date of cessation.

If a participant of the Optional Retirement Program owes an overpayment to the Disability Income Plan at the time the beneficiary would first qualify for an unreduced retirement benefit had the member elected to be a member of the Teachers’ and State
Employees’ Retirement System, then the participant shall pay the total overpayment amount due to the Disability Income Plan. If the participant fails to pay the total amount of the overpayment due to the Disability Income Plan
within six months after the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance, then the participant shall not be allowed to enroll in a new year of coverage under the North Carolina State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees until one of the following occurs:

The Disability Income Plan receives from the participant payment in full of the total overpayment due.

The participant has made payment arrangements approved by the Executive Director of the Retirement System.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2007-325, s. 3; 2021-75, s. 6.1(a).

§ 135-108.
Post disability benefit adjustments.

The compensation upon which the short-term or long-term disability benefit is calculated under the provisions of G.S. 135-105(c) or G.S. 135-106(b) may be increased by any permanent across-the-board salary increase granted to employees of the State by
the General Assembly and the benefits payable to beneficiaries shall be recalculated based upon the increased compensation, reduced by any percentage increase in Social Security benefits granted by the Social Security Administration
times the amount used in the reduction of benefits for primary Social Security disability or retirement benefit as provided in G.S. 135-106(b). The provisions of this section shall be subject to future acts of the General Assembly.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2001-424, s. 32.32A.

§ 135-109.
Reports of earnings.

The Department of State Treasurer and Board of Trustees may require each beneficiary to annually provide a statement of the beneficiary’s income received as compensation for services, including fees, commissions, or similar items, income received from
business, and benefits received from the Social Security Administration, the federal Veterans Administration, any other federal agency, under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, or under the provisions of

G.S. 127A-108

. The benefit payable to a beneficiary who does not or refuses to provide the information requested within 120 days after such request may be suspended until the information so requested is provided, and should such refusal
or failure to provide such information continue for 180 days after such request the right of a beneficiary to a benefit under the Article may be terminated.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2003-359, s. 23; 2016-108, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-108, s. 8, effective July 22, 2016, substituted “may” for “shall” following “Board of Trustees” in the first sentence; substituted “120 days” for “60 days,” “may be suspended” for “shall not be paid a benefit,” and “180 days” for “240
days” in the last sentence.

§ 135-110.
Funding and management of funds.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that a trust fund be created that provides an irrevocable source of funding to be used, to the extent the fund’s assets are sufficient, only for disability benefits to participants and beneficiaries. Accordingly,
the following provisions apply to that trust fund:

A trust fund, the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina Trust Fund, is hereby created to which all receipts, transfers, appropriations, contributions, investment earnings and other income belonging to the Plan shall be deposited, and from which all
benefits and expenses against the Plan shall be disbursed. The Board of Trustees shall be the trustee of the Fund.

Employer and non-employer contributions to the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina Trust Fund and earnings on those contributions are irrevocable. The assets of the Fund are dedicated to providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries in accordance
with the Plan’s benefit terms. The assets of the Fund are not subject to the claims of creditors of the employers and non-employers making contributions to the Fund, are not subject to the claims of any creditors of the
Fund’s trustees and administrators, and are not subject to the claims of participants and beneficiaries.

Disability Income Plan of North Carolina Trust Fund assets may be used for reasonable expenses to administer benefits provided by the Fund as approved by the Board of Trustees.

The Board of Trustees shall on the basis of such economic and demographic assumptions duly adopted, determine and adopt a uniform percentage of compensation as is defined in Article 1 of this Chapter which would be sufficient to fund the benefits payable
under this Article on a term cost method basis as recommended by an actuary engaged by the Board of Trustees. Such uniform percentage of compensation shall not be inconsistent with acts of the General Assembly as may be thereafter
adopted.

Each employer shall contribute monthly to the Plan an amount determined by applying the uniform percentage of compensation adopted by the Board of Trustees multiplied by the compensation of teachers and employees reportable to the Retirement System or
the Optional Retirement Program. Such monthly contribution shall be paid by the employer from the same source of funds from which the compensation of teachers and employees are paid.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds and shall invest the assets of the fund in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2017-129, s. 2(o).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-129, s. 2(o), effective June 30, 2017, rewrote subsection (a).

§ 135-111.
Applicability of other pension laws.

Subject to the provisions of this Article, the provisions of

G.S. 135-9

, entitled “Exemption from taxes, garnishment, attachment, etc.”;

G.S. 135-10

, entitled “Protection against fraud”;

G.S. 135-10.1

, entitled “Failure to Respond”; and

G.S. 135-17

, entitled “Facility of payment” shall be applicable to this Article and to benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of this Article.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2005-91, s. 7; 2012-185, s. 3(b); 2013-288, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-91, s. 7, effective July 1, 2005, inserted “G.S. 135-10.1, entitled ‘Failure to Respond’.”

Session Laws 2012-185, s. 3(b), effective July 1, 2012, added “G.S. 135-18.11, entitled ‘Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance or disability benefit’.”

Session Laws 2013-288, s. 8, effective July 1, 2013, deleted “G.S. 135-18.11, entitled ’Improper receipt of decedent’s retirement allowance or disability benefit’ ” following “ ‘Failure to Respond’.”

§ 135-111.1.
Improper receipt of decedent’s Disability Income Plan allowance.

A person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the person, with the intent to defraud, receives money as a result of cashing, depositing, or receiving a direct deposit of a decedent’s Disability Income Plan allowance and the person (i) knows that he or
she is not entitled to the decedent’s Disability Income Plan allowance, (ii) receives the benefit at least two months after the date of the beneficiary’s death, and (iii) does not attempt to inform this Retirement System of the beneficiary’s
death.

History.
2013-288, s. 9(a).

§ 135-112.
Transition provisions.

Any participant in service as of the date of ratification of this Article and who becomes disabled after one year of membership service will be eligible for all benefits provided under this Article notwithstanding the requirement of five years’ membership
service to receive the long-term benefit; provided, however, any beneficiary who receives benefits as a result of this transition provision before completing five years of membership service shall receive lifetime benefits in lieu
of service accruals under the Retirement System as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-4(y).

All benefit recipients under the former Disability Salary Continuation Plan provided for in

G.S. 135-34

and the rules adopted thereto shall become beneficiaries under this Plan under the same provisions and conditions including the benefit amounts payable as were provided under the former Disability Salary Continuation
Plan. Any benefit recipient under the former Disability Salary Continuation Plan who returns to service on or after January 1, 1988, who subsequently becomes disabled due to the same disabling condition within 90 days after restoration
to service shall not become a participant of the Disability Income Plan but shall be entitled to a restoration of the disability benefit under the same provisions and conditions, including the benefit amounts payable, as were provided
under the former Disability Salary Continuation Plan, and shall be entitled to make application for disability retirement benefits under the Retirement System under the same provisions and conditions as were provided members whose
service terminated prior to January 1, 1988.

Any person who retired on a disability retirement allowance from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System prior to the effective date of this Article shall be entitled to apply for and receive any benefits that would have otherwise been provided
under the Disability Salary Continuation Plan provided for in

G.S. 135-34

and shall become beneficiaries under this Plan, under the same provisions and conditions, including the benefit amounts payable, as were provided under the former Disability Salary Continuation Plan.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 1989, c. 717, s. 12.

§ 135-113.
Reservation of power to change.

The benefits provided in this Article as applicable to a participant who is not a beneficiary under the provisions of this Article shall not be considered as a part of an employment contract, either written or implied, and the General Assembly reserves
the right at any time and from time to time to modify, amend in whole or in part or repeal the provisions of this Article.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q).

§ 135-114.
Reciprocity of membership service with the Legislative Retirement System and the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System.

Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Article, membership service standing to the credit of a member of the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System shall be added to the membership
service standing to the credit of a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System. However, in the event that a participant or beneficiary is a retired member of the Legislative Retirement System or the Consolidated
Judicial Retirement System whose retirement benefit was suspended upon entrance into membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, such membership service standing to the credit of the retired member prior to
retirement shall be likewise counted. Membership service under this section shall not be counted twice for the same period of time.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(q).

§§ 135-115 through 135-149.

Reserved for future codification purposes.